Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1035.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 14COMPASSIONATE ACCESS TO MEDICAL MARIJUANASection 1401. Legislative intent.12345678910111213141516171819202122 It is the intent of the General Assembly to support the ability of a terminally ill patient to safely use medical marijuana within specified health care facilities in compliance with this chapter.Section 1402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Patient." An individual who is terminally ill."Terminally ill." A medical condition resulting in a prognosis of life of one year or less, if the disease follows its natural course.Section 1403. Permitted use.(a) Health care facilities.--A health care facility shall permit a patient to use medical marijuana and do all of the following:(1) Prohibit smoking or vaping as methods to use medical marijuana.(2) Include the use of medical marijuana within the patient's medical records. (3) Require a patient to provide a copy of the patient's valid identification card or a copy of the patient's written documentation as provided under this act.(4) Reasonably restrict the manner in which a patient stores and uses medical marijuana, including requiring the medical marijuana to be stored in a locked container, to ensure the safety of other patients, guests and employees of 20250SB1035PN1204 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the health care facility, compliance with other state laws and the safe operations of the health care facility.(5) Develop and disseminate written guidelines for the use of medical marijuana within the health care facility under this chapter.(b) Limitation.--This section does not apply to a patient receiving emergency services and care or to the emergency department of a health care facility while the patient is receiving emergency services and care.Section 1404. Patient guidance and discharge plan. A health care facility is not required to provide a patient with a recommendation to use medical marijuana in compliance with this act or include medical marijuana in a patient's discharge plan.Section 1405. Compliance.(a) Drug and medication requirement.--A health care facility permitting patient use of medical marijuana shall comply with drug and medication requirements applicable to this act.(b) Licensure.--Compliance with this chapter shall not be a condition for obtaining, retaining or renewing a license as a health care facility.(c) Suspension.--(1) If a Federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services takes one of the following actions, a health care facility may suspend compliance with this chapter until the regulatory agency, United States Department of Justice or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies the health care facility that it may resume permitting the use of medical marijuana within the health care facility:20250SB1035PN1204 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A Federal regulatory agency or the United States Department of Justice initiates enforcement action against a health care facility related to the facility's compliance with a State-regulated medical marijuana program.(ii) A Federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services issues a rule or otherwise provides notification to the health care facility that expressly prohibits the use of medical marijuana in health care facilities or otherwise prohibits compliance with a State-regulated medical marijuana program.(2) This subsection shall not be construed to permit a health care facility to prohibit patient use of medical marijuana due solely to the fact that cannabis is a Schedule I drug under the Controlled Substances Act (Public Law 91-513, 84 Stat. 1236) or other Federal constraints on the use of medical marijuana that were in existence prior to the effective date of this paragraph.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1035PN1204 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920